Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-734
Securities Act of Nebraska; inapplicable; when.

Whenever any corporation organized under the Electric Cooperative Corporation Act has borrowed money from any federal agency, the obligations issued to secure the payment of such money shall be exempt from the provisions of the Securities Act of Nebraska, and the act shall not apply to the issuance of membership certificates.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 30, p. 212;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-830;

R.S.1943, § 70-734;

Laws 1967, c. 424, § 1, p. 1300;

Laws 1998, LB 894, § 7.

Securities Act of Nebraska, see section 8-1123.